Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2251
Probation administrator; appointment; qualifications.

The Supreme Court shall appoint a probation administrator who shall be a person with appropriate experience in the field of probation or with training in relevant disciplines at a recognized college or university and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Supreme Court.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 536, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 36.